en: Shrimp preparations
fr: Préparations aux crevettes

en: Shrimp fritters
fr: Beignet de crevette, Beignets de crevette

en: Breaded shrimps
fr: Crevettes panées

en: Shrimps
bg: Скариди
ca: Gambes
de: Garnele
es: Camarones, Camarón
fi: pirpana
fr: Crevettes
he: שרימפס, חסילונים
hr: kozice
it: Gambero
nl: Garnalen
pl: Krewetki
ru: Креветки

en: Whiteleg shrimps, Pacific white shrimps
la: Litopenaeus vannamei
nl: Witpootgarnalen

en: Cooked shrimps
fr: Crevettes cuites
hr: Kuhani škampi
it: Gamberetti Cotti, gamberi cucinati
nl: Gekookte garnalen, Garnalen (gekookt)

en: Frozen shrimps
fr: Crevettes surgelées
hr: Smrznuti škampi
nl: Bevroren garnalen

en: Frozen cooked shrimps
fr: Crevettes cuites surgelées

en: Shrimps tails
fi: katkaravun pyrstöt
fr: Queues de crevettes
hr: Repovi račića
it: Code di gambero
nl: Garnaalstaarten

en: Giant tiger prawns
fr: Crevettes géantes tigrées, Crevette géante tigrée, Penaeus monodon
hr: Divovske tigraste kozice
ja: ウシエビ
nl: Grote tijgergarnalen

en: Brown shrimp, grey shrimp
ca: Gamba d'alguer
da: Almindelig hestereje
de: Nordseegarnele, Sandgarnele
fr: Crevettes grises, Crangon crangon, Boucaut, Sauterelle, Garnote, Garnela nakrapiana
hr: Smeđi škampi
ja: ヨーロッパエビジャコ
nl: Noordzeegarnalen, grijze garnalen, Gewone garnaal, Grijze garnaal, Noordzeegarnaal
sq: Karkalec deti i kafenjtë
sv: Hästräka

en: Northern prawns, Pandalus borealis
fr: Crevettes nordiques, Crevette nordique, Crevette nordique du Canada, Pandalus borealis
hr: Sjeverne kozice
it: Gamberetti boreali
ja: ホンホッコクアカエビ
nl: Pandalis Borealis

en: Pacific shrimps
es: Camarones del Pacífico
fr: Crevettes du Pacifique
hr: Pacifički škampi
it: Gamberetti del Pacifico
nl: Stille Oceaan garnalen

en: Shrimps on skewer, Shrimp skewers
de: Garnelenspieße
fr: Brochettes de crevettes, Brochette de crevettes
hr: Škampi na ražnjiće
nl: Inktivisspiesjes

en: Prawns, Gambas
de: Garnelen
es: Gambas
fi: katkaravut
fr: Gambas, Aristeidae
hr: Crvena kozica
it: Gamberetti
nl: Gambas

en: Blue and red shrimp, Red prawn, Aristeus antennatus
ca: Gamba vermella, gamba roja, gamba de Palamós, gamba rosada
es: Gamba roja, gamba rosada
fr: Crevette rouge, gambon rouge
it: Gambero rosso mediterraneo
la: Aristeus antennatus

en: Deep water pink shrimps
fr: Crevettes roses

en: Cooked Prawns
ca: Gamba blanca, gamba d'altura
es: Gamba blanca, gamba de altura
fr: Crevettes roses cuites

en: Lobster bisque
fr: Bisques de homard
hr: Biskvit od jastoga
it: Bisque di aragosta, Bisque di astice
nl: Kreeftensoep

en: lobsters, lobster
de: hummer
fr: homard, homards
hr: Jastozi
nl: kreeft, zeekreeft